Missouri, session 2026, HB2463.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 198, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 198.700, to read as follows:
198.700. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Facility", an independent living facility or a long-term care facility;
(2) "Independent living facility", a communal living structure in which at least
fifty percent of the residents are fifty-five years of age or older that provides its residents
with on-site access to dining, transportation, medical care, and basic housekeeping and
laundry services and that is not licensed by the state;
(3) "Long-term care facility", any facility licensed under this chapter;
(4) "Referral agency", an individual or entity that provides referrals to a facility
for a fee that is collected from the facility or for a fee that is collected from a prospective
resident or the legal representative of a prospective resident. The term "referral
agency" shall not include a facility or its employees, a family member of a resident of a
facility, or a resident of a facility regardless of whether the resident who refers a
prospective resident to a facility receives a discount or other remuneration from the
facility.
2. A referral agency shall provide to a prospective resident or the legal
representative of the prospective resident referred to a facility:
(1) Written or electronic documentation of any agreement, including any
agreement to terms and conditions, or acknowledgment or consent for services between
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2463 2
the referral agency and the prospective resident or legal representative of the
prospective resident; and
(2) Written or electronic disclosure of:
(a) Any existing relationship between the referral agency and the facility,
including common ownership or control of the facility and financial, business,
management, or familial relationships between the referral agency and the facility;
(b) Any fee that the referral agency receives from the facility for the referral and
a description of the services provided by the referral agency in exchange for the fee paid
by the facility;
(c) The right of the prospective resident or legal representative of the prospective
resident to terminate the referral agency's services for any reason at any time without a
fee or other penalty for such termination and with notice of the termination provided by
the referral agency to all facilities to which the prospective resident has been referred;
(d) The right of the prospective resident or legal representative of the
prospective resident to request not to be contacted in the future by the referral agency
or any entity to which the referral agency has distributed the prospective resident's
information;
(e) The right of the prospective resident or legal representative of the prospective
resident to receive the referral agency's privacy policy upon request to the referral
agency; and
(f) The referral agency's possible distribution of the prospective resident's
information to other entities that may call and solicit the prospective resident to
purchase goods and services.
3. The referral agency and the prospective resident or legal representative of the
prospective resident shall sign and date, in writing or electronically, the disclosure
required in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section. The referral agency shall
provide a written or electronic copy of the signed disclosure to the facility on or before
the date the resident becomes an occupant of or is admitted to the facility or payment is
made by the facility to the referral agency.
4. No referral agency shall charge a fee or other penalty to any facility resulting
from the termination of an agreement by a prospective resident or legal representative
of a prospective resident.
5. The facility shall:
(1) Pay the referral agency any fees, which shall be deemed earned when the
referral agency has performed the services required under its agreement with the
facility, regardless of the prospective resident's or prospective resident's legal

HCS HB 2463 3
representative's termination of the agreement for services between the referral agency
and the prospective resident or legal representative of the prospective resident; and
(2) Not sell or transfer the prospective resident's or prospective resident's legal
representative's contact information to a third party without the written consent of the
prospective resident or legal representative of the prospective resident.
6. A referral agency that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of up to
five hundred dollars per violation.
7. The attorney general or a circuit attorney may bring a civil action on behalf of
the state to seek the imposition of a civil penalty for a violation of this section or to
enjoin the continuance of the violation by the referral agency.
✔